Hawaii statutes.
[§432E-2] Conflict with other laws. If
there is a conflict with any other law, this chapter shall prevail to the
extent that this chapter offers greater protection or rights to the enrollee.
[L 1998, c 178, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next